Utah statutes.
16-10a-626.   Shares without certificates.

(1)  Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may authorize the issuance of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates.  The authorization does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

(2)  Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall send the shareholder a written statement of the information required on certificates by Subsections 16-10a-625(2) and (3), and, if applicable, Section 16-10a-627.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

